Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.587] RENTAL HOUSING; LIMITATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "city" means a statutory or home rule charter city. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Maximum annual rental housing license fee. new text end new text begin A city may not charge more than $100 annually for a rental housing license. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Lease conditions prohibited. new text end new text begin A city may not require a lease or other contract for rental housing to include specific conditions or requirements that go beyond the requirements for rental housing under state or federal law. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Rental housing education. new text end new text begin A city may offer educational programming for owners of rental housing. The programming must be optional and must be available online. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end